Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 36 WATER QUALITY
§ 39-3636. Failure to provide sewage disposal — Penalties.

Failure to provide certified sewage disposal as provided in section 39-3635(1), Idaho Code, or failure to connect to a district sewer system or to pay, when due, any connection fee or charge, any monthly rate, toll or charge, or any special benefits payment, all as required and provided for in subsections (2) and (3) of section 39-3635, Idaho Code, shall result in the following:

Forfeiture of lease to the state of Idaho after reasonable notice and hearing, as shall be prescribed in rules to be adopted by the department issuing the lease pursuant to the applicable provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, as now or hereafter in force.

Loss of sewage treatment facility credit on any transfer of lease or new lease of such site after notice and hearing before the department issuing such lease.

The department issuing any cottage site lease, upon its own motion or upon receiving notice from a water and sewer district pursuant to the provisions of section 39-3635(4), Idaho Code, of the failure of a cottage site lessee to connect to a district sewer system or to pay any connection fee or charge, any monthly rate, toll or charge, or any special benefits payments, when due, is authorized to invoke either or both remedies at its discretion or may take such other action allowed by law to enforce the provisions of the lease and the requirements of section 39-3635, Idaho Code, that each cottage site lessee connect to a district sewer system and pay all fees, charges and payments when due.

§ 39-3637. State board of environmental quality — Rules — Inspection.

The state board of environmental quality shall adopt reasonable rules and standards for the installation and operation of cottage site sewage treatment facilities, and shall provide adequate inspection services so as not to delay unreasonably the construction of any lessee. Duplicate originals of all certificates issued by the director of the department of environmental quality shall be filed with the director of the department issuing a cottage site lease.

The director of the department of environmental quality shall maintain a site by site inventory of such sewage disposal systems that may exist. The inventory shall ascertain:

If the existing system meets the board standards. If the system meets all standards and rules for cottage sewage disposal systems a certificate shall be issued immediately.

If the system does not meet the board standards. In such case, the lessee shall be advised in writing of the actions necessary to meet the proper standards. A copy of such report shall be filed with the state agency granting the lease. The modifications, unless specifically exempted from the time limit, as provided in sections 39-3634 through 39-3637, Idaho Code, shall be completed within two (2) years of the date of the written notice.

§ 39-3638. Final determination by issuing department authorized.

In the event of dispute or unreasonable delay on the part of lessee or the department of environmental quality, the department issuing a cottage site lease may, upon notice and hearing, make a final determination consistent with control of water pollution and public health.

§ 39-3639. Continuation of cottage site lease program.

The legislature of the state of Idaho recognizes that certain state lands are presently leased for cottage site uses and are subject to leases and contracts duly authorized by law. It is legislative intent to continue to recognize such leases. However, it is also legislative intent that no new or additional lands be platted, subdivided or leased for cottage site leases, unless and until the condition and precedents listed below have been met.

No additional state lands shall be further platted or subdivided, nor any new cottage site leases entered into, unless and until the following provisions have been met:

The department of lands shall have completed a comprehensive planning process, as to its further participation in, and extension of, the cottage site lease program;

The department of lands shall complete a comprehensive planning process as to the extension of cottage site leasing for that immediate geographic area;

No new cottage site leases shall be entered into unless and until an adequate water system and an adequate sewage collection and treatment system have been installed. Both of these systems shall meet applicable state health standards and rules. (i) The costs for providing these systems shall be incorporated into the annual lease rates for the newly created serviced lots, unless other specific provisions for payment have been required by the state board of land commissioners. (ii) As an alternate means of securing the necessary funds for the construction of water and sewer systems which must meet state standards and rules, the state board of land commissioners may include as a condition of the new lease the requirement that the lessee must prepay his share of the construction costs of the water and sewer system. In all cases, however, such prepayment shall be made, and adequate water and sewer systems shall be installed and in operation before such cottage sites may be inhabited.

The provisions of subsection (1) herein shall not apply to unimproved lots within cottage subdivisions in which at least eighty per cent (80%) of the lots already have cottages upon them.